test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns1-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
    kott+N+Sg+Par: kotti
    kott+N+Sg+Tra: kotiks
    kott+N+Sg+Trm: kotini
    kuld+N+Pl+Abe: kuldadeta
    kuld+N+Pl+Abl: kuldadelt
    kuld+N+Pl+Ade: kuldadel
    kuld+N+Pl+All: kuldadele
    kuld+N+Pl+Com: kuldadega
    kuld+N+Pl+Ela: kuldadest
    kuld+N+Pl+Ess: kuldadena
    kuld+N+Pl+Gen: kuldade
    kuld+N+Pl+Ill: kuldadesse
    kuld+N+Pl+Ine: kuldades
    kuld+N+Pl+Nom: kullad
    kuld+N+Pl+Par: kuldasid
    kuld+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kuldi
    kuld+N+Pl+Tra: kuldadeks
    kuld+N+Pl+Trm: kuldadeni
    kuld+N+Sg+Abe: kullata
    kuld+N+Sg+Abl: kullalt
    kuld+N+Sg+Ade: kullal
    kuld+N+Sg+All: kullale
    kuld+N+Sg+Com: kullaga
    kuld+N+Sg+Ela: kullast
    kuld+N+Sg+Ess: kullana
    kuld+N+Sg+Gen: kulla
    kuld+N+Sg+Ill: kulda
    kuld+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kullasse
    kuld+N+Sg+Ine: kullas
    kuld+N+Sg+Nom: kuld
    kuld+N+Sg+Par: kulda
    kuld+N+Sg+Tra: kullaks
    kuld+N+Sg+Trm: kullani
    kurat+N+Pl+Abe: kuraditeta
    kurat+N+Pl+Abl: kuraditelt
    kurat+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kuradeilt
    kurat+N+Pl+Ade: kuraditel
    kurat+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kuradeil
    kurat+N+Pl+All: kuraditele
    kurat+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kuradeile
    kurat+N+Pl+Com: kuraditega
    kurat+N+Pl+Ela: kuraditest
    kurat+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kuradeist
    kurat+N+Pl+Ess: kuraditena
    kurat+N+Pl+Gen: kuradite
    kurat+N+Pl+Ill: kuraditesse
    kurat+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kuradeisse
    kurat+N+Pl+Ine: kuradites
    kurat+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kuradeis
    kurat+N+Pl+Nom: kuradid
    kurat+N+Pl+Par: kuradeid
    kurat+N+Pl+Tra: kuraditeks
    kurat+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kuradeiks
    kurat+N+Pl+Trm: kuraditeni
    kurat+N+Sg+Abe: kuradita
    kurat+N+Sg+Abl: kuradilt
    kurat+N+Sg+Ade: kuradil
    kurat+N+Sg+All: kuradile
    kurat+N+Sg+Com: kuradiga
    kurat+N+Sg+Ela: kuradist
    kurat+N+Sg+Ess: kuradina
    kurat+N+Sg+Gen: kuradi
    kurat+N+Sg+Ill: kuradisse
    kurat+N+Sg+Ine: kuradis
    kurat+N+Sg+Nom: kurat
    kurat+N+Sg+Par: kuradit
    kurat+N+Sg+Tra: kuradiks
    kurat+N+Sg+Trm: kuradini
    kõrb+N+Pl+Abe: kõrbeteta
    kõrb+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: kõrbedeta
    kõrb+N+Pl+Abl: kõrbetelt
    kõrb+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kõrbedelt
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ade: kõrbetel
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kõrbedel
    kõrb+N+Pl+All: kõrbetele
    kõrb+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kõrbedele
    kõrb+N+Pl+Com: kõrbetega
    kõrb+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: kõrbedega
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ela: kõrbetest
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kõrbedest
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ess: kõrbetena
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: kõrbedena
    kõrb+N+Pl+Gen: kõrbete
    kõrb+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: kõrbede
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ill: kõrbetesse
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kõrbedesse
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ine: kõrbetes
    kõrb+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kõrbedes
    kõrb+N+Pl+Nom: kõrbed
    kõrb+N+Pl+Par: kõrbeid
    kõrb+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: [kõrbesid, kõrbi]
    kõrb+N+Pl+Tra: kõrbeteks
    kõrb+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kõrbedeks
    kõrb+N+Pl+Trm: kõrbeteni
    kõrb+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: kõrbedeni
    kõrb+N+Sg+Abe: kõrbeta
    kõrb+N+Sg+Abl: kõrbelt
    kõrb+N+Sg+Ade: kõrbel
    kõrb+N+Sg+All: kõrbele
    kõrb+N+Sg+Com: kõrbega
    kõrb+N+Sg+Ela: kõrbest
    kõrb+N+Sg+Ess: kõrbena
    kõrb+N+Sg+Gen: kõrbe
    kõrb+N+Sg+Ill: kõrbesse
    kõrb+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: kõrbe
    kõrb+N+Sg+Ine: kõrbes
    kõrb+N+Sg+Nom: kõrb
    kõrb+N+Sg+Par: kõrbe
    kõrb+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: kõrbet
    kõrb+N+Sg+Tra: kõrbeks
    kõrb+N+Sg+Trm: kõrbeni
    kõrs+N+Pl+Abe: kõrteta
    kõrs+N+Pl+Abl: kõrtelt
    kõrs+N+Pl+Ade: kõrtel
    kõrs+N+Pl+All: kõrtele
    kõrs+N+Pl+Com: kõrtega
    kõrs+N+Pl+Ela: kõrtest
    kõrs+N+Pl+Ess: kõrtena
    kõrs+N+Pl+Gen: kõrte
    kõrs+N+Pl+Ill: kõrtesse
    kõrs+N+Pl+Ine: kõrtes
    kõrs+N+Pl+Nom: kõrred
    kõrs+N+Pl+Par: kõrsi
    kõrs+N+Pl+Tra: kõrteks
    kõrs+N+Pl+Trm: kõrteni
    kõrs+N+Sg+Abe: kõrreta
    kõrs+N+Sg+Abl: kõrrelt
    kõrs+N+Sg+Ade: kõrrel
    kõrs+N+Sg+All: kõrrele
    kõrs+N+Sg+Com: kõrrega
    kõrs+N+Sg+Ela: kõrrest
    kõrs+N+Sg+Ess: kõrrena
    kõrs+N+Sg+Gen: kõrre
    kõrs+N+Sg+Ill: kõrresse
    kõrs+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: kõrde
    kõrs+N+Sg+Ine: kõrres
    kõrs+N+Sg+Nom: kõrs
    kõrs+N+Sg+Par: kõrt
    kõrs+N+Sg+Tra: kõrreks
    kõrs+N+Sg+Trm: kõrreni
    käive+N+Pl+Abe: käiveteta
    käive+N+Pl+Abl: käivetelt
    käive+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: käibeilt
    käive+N+Pl+Ade: käivetel
    käive+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: käibeil
    käive+N+Pl+All: käivetele
    käive+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: käibeile
    käive+N+Pl+Com: käivetega
    käive+N+Pl+Ela: käivetest
    käive+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: käibeist
    käive+N+Pl+Ess: käivetena
    käive+N+Pl+Gen: käivete
    käive+N+Pl+Ill: käivetesse
    käive+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: käibeisse
    käive+N+Pl+Ine: käivetes
    käive+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: käibeis
    käive+N+Pl+Nom: käibed
    käive+N+Pl+Par: käibeid
    käive+N+Pl+Tra: käiveteks
    käive+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: käibeiks
    käive+N+Pl+Trm: käiveteni
    käive+N+Sg+Abe: käibeta
    käive+N+Sg+Abl: käibelt
    käive+N+Sg+Ade: käibel
    käive+N+Sg+All: käibele
    käive+N+Sg+Com: käibega
    käive+N+Sg+Ela: käibest
    käive+N+Sg+Ess: käibena
    käive+N+Sg+Gen: käibe
    käive+N+Sg+Ill: käibesse
    käive+N+Sg+Ine: käibes
    käive+N+Sg+Nom: käive
    käive+N+Sg+Par: käivet
    käive+N+Sg+Tra: käibeks
    käive+N+Sg+Trm: käibeni
    kärbes+N+Pl+Abe: kärbesteta
    kärbes+N+Pl+Abe+Use/NotNorm: kärbseteta
    kärbes+N+Pl+Abl: kärbestelt
    kärbes+N+Pl+Abl+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetelt
    kärbes+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kärbseilt
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ade: kärbestel
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ade+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetel
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kärbseil
    kärbes+N+Pl+All: kärbestele
    kärbes+N+Pl+All+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetele
    kärbes+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kärbseile
    kärbes+N+Pl+Com: kärbestega
    kärbes+N+Pl+Com+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetega
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ela: kärbestest
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetest
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kärbseist
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ess: kärbestena
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ess+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetena
    kärbes+N+Pl+Gen: kärbeste
    kärbes+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NotNorm: kärbsete
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ill: kärbestesse
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ill+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetesse
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kärbseisse
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ine: kärbestes
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ine+Use/NotNorm: kärbsetes
    kärbes+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kärbseis
    kärbes+N+Pl+Nom: kärbsed
    kärbes+N+Pl+Par: kärbseid
    kärbes+N+Pl+Tra: kärbesteks
    kärbes+N+Pl+Tra+Use/NotNorm: kärbseteks
    kärbes+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kärbseiks
    kärbes+N+Pl+Trm: kärbesteni
    kärbes+N+Pl+Trm+Use/NotNorm: kärbseteni
    kärbes+N+Sg+Abe: kärbseta
    kärbes+N+Sg+Abl: kärbselt
    kärbes+N+Sg+Ade: kärbsel
    kärbes+N+Sg+All: kärbsele
    kärbes+N+Sg+Com: kärbsega
    kärbes+N+Sg+Ela: kärbsest
    kärbes+N+Sg+Ess: kärbsena
    kärbes+N+Sg+Gen: kärbse
    kärbes+N+Sg+Ill: kärbsesse
    kärbes+N+Sg+Ine: kärbses
    kärbes+N+Sg+Nom: kärbes
    kärbes+N+Sg+Par: kärbest
    kärbes+N+Sg+Tra: kärbseks
    kärbes+N+Sg+Trm: kärbseni
    kärg+N+Pl+Abe: kärgedeta
    kärg+N+Pl+Abl: kärgedelt
    kärg+N+Pl+Ade: kärgedel
    kärg+N+Pl+All: kärgedele
    kärg+N+Pl+Com: kärgedega
    kärg+N+Pl+Ela: kärgedest
    kärg+N+Pl+Ess: kärgedena
    kärg+N+Pl+Gen: kärgede
    kärg+N+Pl+Ill: kärgedesse
    kärg+N+Pl+Ine: kärgedes
    kärg+N+Pl+Nom: kärjed
    kärg+N+Pl+Par: kärgesid
    kärg+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kärgi
    kärg+N+Pl+Tra: kärgedeks
    kärg+N+Pl+Trm: kärgedeni
    kärg+N+Sg+Abe: kärjeta
    kärg+N+Sg+Abl: kärjelt
    kärg+N+Sg+Ade: kärjel
    kärg+N+Sg+All: kärjele
    kärg+N+Sg+Com: kärjega
    kärg+N+Sg+Ela: kärjest
    kärg+N+Sg+Ess: kärjena
    kärg+N+Sg+Gen: kärje
    kärg+N+Sg+Ill: kärge
    kärg+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kärjesse
    kärg+N+Sg+Ine: kärjes
    kärg+N+Sg+Nom: kärg
    kärg+N+Sg+Par: kärge
    kärg+N+Sg+Tra: kärjeks
    kärg+N+Sg+Trm: kärjeni
    köis+N+Pl+Abe: köiteta
    köis+N+Pl+Abl: köitelt
    köis+N+Pl+Ade: köitel
    köis+N+Pl+All: köitele
    köis+N+Pl+Com: köitega
    köis+N+Pl+Ela: köitest
    köis+N+Pl+Ess: köitena
    köis+N+Pl+Gen: köite
    köis+N+Pl+Ill: köitesse
    köis+N+Pl+Ine: köites
    köis+N+Pl+Nom: köied
    köis+N+Pl+Par: köisi
    köis+N+Pl+Tra: köiteks
    köis+N+Pl+Trm: köiteni
    köis+N+Sg+Abe: köieta
    köis+N+Sg+Abl: köielt
    köis+N+Sg+Ade: köiel
    köis+N+Sg+All: köiele
    köis+N+Sg+Com: köiega
    köis+N+Sg+Ela: köiest
    köis+N+Sg+Ess: köiena
    köis+N+Sg+Gen: köie
    köis+N+Sg+Ill: köide
    köis+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: köiesse
    köis+N+Sg+Ine: köies
    köis+N+Sg+Nom: köis
    köis+N+Sg+Par: köit
    köis+N+Sg+Tra: köieks
    köis+N+Sg+Trm: köieni
    köömen+N+Pl+Abe: köömneteta
    köömen+N+Pl+Abl: köömnetelt
    köömen+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: köömneilt
    köömen+N+Pl+Ade: köömnetel
    köömen+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: köömneil
    köömen+N+Pl+All: köömnetele
    köömen+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: köömneile
    köömen+N+Pl+Com: köömnetega
    köömen+N+Pl+Ela: köömnetest
    köömen+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: köömneist
    köömen+N+Pl+Ess: köömnetena
    köömen+N+Pl+Gen: köömnete
    köömen+N+Pl+Ill: köömnetesse
    köömen+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: köömneisse
    köömen+N+Pl+Ine: köömnetes
    köömen+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: köömneis
    köömen+N+Pl+Nom: köömned
    köömen+N+Pl+Par: köömneid
    köömen+N+Pl+Tra: köömneteks
    köömen+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: köömneiks
    köömen+N+Pl+Trm: köömneteni
    köömen+N+Sg+Abe: köömneta
    köömen+N+Sg+Abl: köömnelt
    köömen+N+Sg+Ade: köömnel
    köömen+N+Sg+All: köömnele
    köömen+N+Sg+Com: köömnega
    köömen+N+Sg+Ela: köömnest
    köömen+N+Sg+Ess: köömnena
    köömen+N+Sg+Gen: köömne
    köömen+N+Sg+Ill: köömnesse
    köömen+N+Sg+Ine: köömnes
    köömen+N+Sg+Nom: köömen
    köömen+N+Sg+Par: köömnet
    köömen+N+Sg+Par+Use/CommonNotNorm: kööment
    köömen+N+Sg+Tra: köömneks
    köömen+N+Sg+Trm: köömneni
    laas+N+Pl+Abe: laanteta
    laas+N+Pl+Abl: laantelt
    laas+N+Pl+Ade: laantel
    laas+N+Pl+All: laantele
    laas+N+Pl+Com: laantega
    laas+N+Pl+Ela: laantest
    laas+N+Pl+Ess: laantena
    laas+N+Pl+Gen: laante
    laas+N+Pl+Ill: laantesse
    laas+N+Pl+Ine: laantes
    laas+N+Pl+Nom: laaned
    laas+N+Pl+Par: laasi
    laas+N+Pl+Tra: laanteks
    laas+N+Pl+Trm: laanteni
    laas+N+Sg+Abe: laaneta
    laas+N+Sg+Abl: laanelt
    laas+N+Sg+Ade: laanel
    laas+N+Sg+All: laanele
    laas+N+Sg+Com: laanega
    laas+N+Sg+Ela: laanest
    laas+N+Sg+Ess: laanena
    laas+N+Sg+Gen: laane
    laas+N+Sg+Ill: laande
    laas+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: laanesse
    laas+N+Sg+Ine: laanes
    laas+N+Sg+Nom: laas
    laas+N+Sg+Par: laant
    laas+N+Sg+Tra: laaneks
    laas+N+Sg+Trm: laaneni
    lagi+N+Pl+Abe: lagedeta
    lagi+N+Pl+Abl: lagedelt
    lagi+N+Pl+Ade: lagedel
    lagi+N+Pl+All: lagedele
    lagi+N+Pl+Com: lagedega
    lagi+N+Pl+Ela: lagedest
    lagi+N+Pl+Ess: lagedena
    lagi+N+Pl+Gen: lagede
    lagi+N+Pl+Ill: lagedesse
    lagi+N+Pl+Ine: lagedes
    lagi+N+Pl+Nom: laed
    lagi+N+Pl+Par: lagesid
    lagi+N+Pl+Tra: lagedeks
    lagi+N+Pl+Trm: lagedeni
    lagi+N+Sg+Abe: laeta
    lagi+N+Sg+Abl: laelt
    lagi+N+Sg+Ade: lael
    lagi+N+Sg+All: laele
    lagi+N+Sg+Com: laega
    lagi+N+Sg+Ela: laest
    lagi+N+Sg+Ess: laena
    lagi+N+Sg+Gen: lae
    lagi+N+Sg+Ill: lakke
    lagi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: laesse
    lagi+N+Sg+Ine: laes
    lagi+N+Sg+Nom: lagi
    lagi+N+Sg+Par: lage
    lagi+N+Sg+Tra: laeks
    lagi+N+Sg+Trm: laeni
    laid+N+Pl+Abe: laidudeta
    laid+N+Pl+Abl: laidudelt
    laid+N+Pl+Ade: laidudel
    laid+N+Pl+All: laidudele
    laid+N+Pl+Com: laidudega
    laid+N+Pl+Ela: laidudest
    laid+N+Pl+Ess: laidudena
    laid+N+Pl+Gen: laidude
    laid+N+Pl+Ill: laidudesse
    laid+N+Pl+Ine: laidudes
    laid+N+Pl+Nom: laiud
    laid+N+Pl+Par: laide
    laid+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: laidusid
    laid+N+Pl+Tra: laidudeks
    laid+N+Pl+Trm: laidudeni
    laid+N+Sg+Abe: laiuta
    laid+N+Sg+Abl: laiult
    laid+N+Sg+Ade: laiul
    laid+N+Sg+All: laiule
    laid+N+Sg+Com: laiuga
    laid+N+Sg+Ela: laiust
    laid+N+Sg+Ess: laiuna
    laid+N+Sg+Gen: laiu
    laid+N+Sg+Ill: laidu
    laid+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: laiusse
    laid+N+Sg+Ine: laius
    laid+N+Sg+Nom: laid
    laid+N+Sg+Par: laidu
    laid+N+Sg+Tra: laiuks
    laid+N+Sg+Trm: laiuni
